Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 2 Creation, Administration, and Management of the Assets of the Retirement System

Administrative rules and regulations.

Rules of General Applicability, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Public School Employees Retirement System, Chapter 513-2-1.

47-4-20.
Creation and administration of the retirement system; corporate powers and privileges; rights in actions; name under which retirement system business shall be transacted.

There is created a retirement system which shall be placed under the management and control of the board for the purposes of providing retirement benefits and other benefits under this chapter for public school employees. It shall be a budget unit of the state government and shall have the power and privileges of a corporation and the right to bring and defend actions and to implead and be impleaded. It shall be known as the “Public School Employees Retirement System,” and by such name all of its business shall be transacted, all of its funds shall be invested, and all of its cash, securities, and other property shall be held.

History.

Ga. L. 1969, p. 998, § 3.

47-4-21.
Creation and administration of the retirement fund.

There is created the Public School Employees Retirement Fund, which shall be administered by the board.

History.

Ga. L. 1969, p. 998, § 11.

47-4-22.
Membership of the board; expenses and per diem; quorum for the transaction of business; chairman, secretary, and treasurer of the board.

The board shall be composed of all members of the Board of Trustees of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia and two additional members appointed by the Governor. The first two members appointed by the Governor shall be appointed to take office on July 1, 1984. One of such members shall be appointed for an initial term of two years and the other for an initial term of four years and until their successors are appointed and qualified. Thereafter, successors shall be appointed to take office on the date of the expiration of the respective terms of office for terms of four years and until their successors are appointed and qualified. In the event of a vacancy for any reason in the membership of the board appointed by the Governor, the Governor shall appoint a person to fill the vacancy for the unexpired term.

The members of the board shall each receive $20.00 per day for each day of attending meetings of the board or for any committee meetings called pursuant to authorization of the board and for time spent in necessary travel. The trustees shall be reimbursed for all actual traveling and other expenses necessarily incurred through service on the board. State officials serving on the board shall receive no per diem but shall be entitled to reimbursement for actual expenses incurred by them in carrying out their duties under this chapter.

Six members at any meeting of the board shall constitute a quorum to transact business. Each member shall be entitled to one vote and five votes shall be necessary for a decision by the board.

The chairman, secretary, and treasurer of the board shall be the same as the chairman, director, and treasurer of the Board of Trustees of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia.

History.

Ga. L. 1969, p. 998, § 11; Ga. L. 1971, p. 416, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 633, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 827, § 1.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1984, p. 827, § 2, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “The membership of the Board of Trustees of the Public School Employees Retirement System, except for the membership thereof consisting of the membership of the Board of Trustees of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia, existing on June 30, 1984, shall stand abolished on July 1, 1984.”

Ga. L. 1984, p. 827, § 3, provided that that Act, which amended this Code section, would become effective July 1, 1984, except that it would become effective upon the date of the Governor’s approval (March 28, 1984) for the administrative purpose of allowing the Governor to consider persons for appointment pursuant to revised subsection (a).

47-4-23.
Exemption of members of the board from liability for their acts, omissions, and conduct; indemnification of members of the board.

The members of the board, and each of them, shall be free from all liability, joint or several, for their acts, omissions, and conduct and for the acts, omissions, and conduct of their duly constituted agents in the administration of the retirement system and the fund. The state shall indemnify and save them, and each of them, harmless from the effects and consequences of their acts, omissions, and conduct in their official capacity, except to the extent that such effects and consequences shall result from their own willful misconduct.

History.

Ga. L. 1969, p. 998, § 16.

47-4-24.
Legal adviser of the board.

The Attorney General shall be the legal adviser of the board.

History.

Ga. L. 1969, p. 998, § 17; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 65/SB 436.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted “adviser” for “advisor” near the end.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The intent of this Act is to repeal obsolete and inoperative provisions and to make certain stylistic corrections in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated. Nothing in this Act shall deny, abridge, increase, renew, revive, or on any way affect any right, benefit, option, credit, or election to which any person was entitled pursuant to such title on June 30, 2010, and the board of trustees of each public retirement system is authorized and directed to provide by regulation for the continuation of any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election not otherwise covered in this Act; provided, however, that any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election shall be subject to the statutory provisions in effect on June 30, 2010.”

47-4-25.
Powers and duties of the board.

The board is given the following powers and duties:

To provide for the collection of all money provided for in this chapter;

To provide for the payment of all administrative expenses;

To hear and decide all applications for retirement benefits under this chapter;

To provide for the payment of all retirement benefits that may be determined to be due under the rules and regulations adopted by the board;

To make and promulgate all necessary rules and regulations not inconsistent with the laws of this state in order to carry out this chapter;

To determine eligibility of persons to receive retirement benefits under this chapter;

To make provisions for refunds or repayments to persons who may be entitled to receive them; and

To keep records of all its meetings.

The board shall also have all other powers necessary for the proper administration of this chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1969, p. 998, § 13.

47-4-26.
Power of board over funds; special account for deposit of funds and payment of benefits and expenses; investment powers; power to employ agents.

The board shall be the trustees of the funds and shall have control of the funds provided for in this chapter and all funds received by the board shall be deposited in a special account to the credit of the Public School Employees Retirement Fund. The benefits under this chapter and all administrative expenses shall be paid from this special account. The board shall have authority to expend the funds in accordance with this chapter.

The board shall have full power to invest and reinvest such funds, subject to all the terms, conditions, limitations, and restrictions imposed by Article 7 of Chapter 20 of this title, the “Public Retirement Systems Investment Authority Law.” Subject to such terms, conditions, limitations, and restrictions, the board shall have full power to hold, purchase, sell, assign, transfer, and dispose of any of the securities and investments in which any of the funds are invested, including the proceeds of any investments and any money belonging to the fund.

The board is authorized to employ agents, including, but not limited to, banks or trust departments thereof, and to contract with such agents for their services as investment advisers and counselors in making recommendations for investments, and in making investments if the board so authorizes.

History.

Ga. L. 1969, p. 998, § 12; Ga. L. 1995, p. 651, § 3; Ga. L. 2000, p. 2, § 6; Ga. L. 2005, p. 535, § 17/HB 460; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 65/SB 436.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted “advisers” for “advisors” in the middle of subsection (c).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The intent of this Act is to repeal obsolete and inoperative provisions and to make certain stylistic corrections in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated. Nothing in this Act shall deny, abridge, increase, renew, revive, or on any way affect any right, benefit, option, credit, or election to which any person was entitled pursuant to such title on June 30, 2010, and the board of trustees of each public retirement system is authorized and directed to provide by regulation for the continuation of any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election not otherwise covered in this Act; provided, however, that any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election shall be subject to the statutory provisions in effect on June 30, 2010.”

47-4-27.
Power of board to take, hold, and invest any gift, grant, or bequest.

The board may take any gift, grant, or bequest, any money, any real or personal property, or any other thing of value and hold or invest the same for the uses and purposes of the retirement system, in accordance with this chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1969, p. 998, § 15.

47-4-28.
Duty of board to keep records of accounts in granting benefits and records of the operations of the board; annual financial statement to the General Assembly.

The board shall keep permanent records of all its accounts in granting retirement benefits and shall keep proper records and books concerning its operation. Each year at the beginning of the regular session of the General Assembly the board shall present an annual financial statement of the fund.

History.

Ga. L. 1969, p. 998, § 14.

47-4-29.
Appropriations for employer contributions; creation of an expense fund; payment prior to commencement date of employer contributions and expenses of retirement system.

The General Assembly shall make appropriations to the retirement system sufficient to provide for the employer contributions required by subsection (b) of Code Section 47-4-60 and to otherwise carry out this chapter.

The board shall establish an expense fund to which shall be credited the funds provided by appropriations of the General Assembly in order to pay the administrative expense of the retirement system and from which shall be paid all expenses incurred in the administration and operation of the retirement system.

The appropriations provided for in this Code section may be made by the general or supplemental appropriations Acts adopted by the General Assembly but no employer or employee contributions to the retirement system shall be made prior to the commencement date. Appropriated funds may be expended prior to the commencement date, pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section, in order to pay the expenses of setting up and beginning operation of the retirement system prior to that date.

History.

Ga. L. 1969, p. 998, § 19.

47-4-30.
Plan year designated.

For purposes of complying with federal Internal Revenue Service rules and regulations, the plan year for this retirement system shall be the 12 month period beginning on July 1 of each year.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-4-30

, enacted by Ga. L. 2009, p. 947, § 21/HB 202.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective May 11, 2009.